Massachusetts, session 194th, H1264.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. As used in this act the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Board”, the Pension Reserves Investment Management Board established in section 23
of chapter 32 of the General Laws.
"Weapons of mass destruction (WMD)" shall have the same meaning as provided in 18
U.S. Code § 2332a(c), as amended from time to time, which defines "weapon of mass
destruction" to include: (1) any destructive device as defined in 18 U.S. Code § 921(a)(4); (2)
any weapon that is designed or intended to cause death or serious bodily injury through the
release, dissemination, or impact of toxic or poisonous chemicals, or their precursors; (3) any
weapon involving a biological agent, toxin, or vector as defined in 18 U.S. Code § 178; or (4)
of 4

any weapon that is designed to release radiation or radioactivity at a level dangerous to human
life.
“Investments” any investment and/or contribution (regardless of nomenclature or type)
whether held and/or made directly or indirectly held and/or internally or externally managed.
“WMD Entities” any entity (regardless of nomenclature or type) which manufactures,
produces, promotes, sells, or distributes WMDs and/or facilitates any of the aforementioned
activities.
“Public Fund”, the Pension Reserves Investment Trust or the Pension Reserves
Investment Management Board charged with managing the pooled investment fund consisting of
the assets of the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems as well as the assets of local
retirement systems under the control of the board.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, within 30 days
of effective date of this act, the Public Fund shall identify all WMD Entities in which the Public
Fund holds Investments and shall file a list of any such holdings with the attorney general and
the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives. The attorney general shall make said list
available to the public no later than 60 days after filing with the legislature.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, it shall be the
settled policy of the Public Fund and of the Board of the Public Fund not to hold Investments in
any WMD Entities. The Public Fund shall sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw all Investments in
WMD Entities identified pursuant to section 2 of this act within 12 months of effective date of
this act. The Board shall also amend the investment policy or equivalent instrument
communicated to external asset and investment managers to forbid future Investments in WMD
of 4

Entities. The Board shall further instruct said managers to divest such Investments in WMD
Entities from the investment fund or carve out such Investments and allocate them to a similar
actively managed fund or funds with indirect holdings devoid of WMD Entities.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, with respect to
actions taken in compliance with this act, the Public Fund shall be exempt from any conflicting
statutory or common law obligation, including any such obligations with respect to choice of
asset managers, investment managers, investment funds, or investments for the Public Fund’s
securities portfolios and all good faith determinations regarding the identification of WMD
Entities subject to divestment as provided for herein.
SECTION 5. Present, future and former board members of the Public Fund, jointly and
individually, state officers and employees, and investment managers under contract with the
Public Fund shall be indemnified from the general fund and held harmless by the commonwealth
from all claims, demands, suits, actions, damages, judgments, costs, charges and expenses,
including court costs and attorneys fees and against all liability, losses and damages of any
nature whatsoever that these present, future or former board members, officers, employees, or
contract investment managers shall or may at any time sustain by reason of any decision to
restrict, reduce, or eliminate investments in WMD entities.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all state
agencies shall: review existing contracts and determine existing contracts with WMD entities;
promptly terminate existing contracts as practicable; and refrain from entering into new contracts
with said WMD Entities, including those identified pursuant to section 2 of this act. State
agencies shall identify all WMD Entities with which they contract and shall file a list of any such
of 4

contracts with the attorney general and the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives.
The attorney general shall make said list available to the public. Nothing in this section is
intended to relieve state agencies of any obligations under applicable laws, rules, or regulations
related to contracting and procurement.
SECTION 7. The Public Fund shall annually, as applicable, file a report with the attorney
general and with the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives. Such report shall
include at a minimum: (i) all Investments sold, redeemed, divested or withdrawn in compliance
with this act within the preceding year; and (ii) all Investments prohibited by this act from which
the public fund has not yet divested.
of 4